Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF648.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. NEW SECTION . 153.25 Licensed sedation provider host permit. 1. The board may issue a licensed sedation provider host permit to a dentist who does all of the following: a. Completes a course approved by the board as described in subsection 3 within the twelve months immediately preceding the submission of the application, or provide evidence that the dentist holds a substantially similar permit issued in another state. House File 648, p. 2 b. Meets the facility and equipment requirements as determined by the board by rule. c. Receives certification in administering advanced cardiovascular life support as determined by the board by rule. d. Submits an application in a form prescribed by the board. 2. A dentist who holds a licensed sedation provider host permit may do all of the following: a. Employ a licensed sedation provider, or a dentist who holds a current moderate sedation or general anesthesia permit issued by the board, to administer moderate sedation on an outpatient basis to a patient who is at least thirteen years of age on whom the dentist is performing a dental procedure. b. Monitor a patient who is at least thirteen years of age who is under moderate sedation. 3. a. The board shall only approve a licensed sedation provider host permit course that provides instruction and an assessment of knowledge and skill in the following areas: (1) Preoperative patient assessment. (2) Emergency scenarios and rescue. (3) Respiratory complication. (4) Patient safety and monitoring. (5) Airway assessment and management. (6) Anesthetic drugs. (7) Recovery. b. A course described in paragraph âaâ shall ensure that a course participant can do all of the following at the conclusion of the course: (1) Identify a high-risk patient. (2) Differentiate between levels of sedation. (3) Monitor a patient receiving moderate sedation. (4) Rescue a patient from a deeper-than-intended level of sedation. c. The board shall review courses for approval on an annual basis and shall only approve a course for which the director of the course has submitted documentation indicating that the course meets the requirements of this subsection. The board may require the director of a course to participate in an interview as part of the approval process. 4. For the purposes of this section, âlicensed sedation House File 648, p. 3 providerâ means a physician anesthesiologist licensed in this state or a certified registered nurse anesthetist licensed in this state. 5. The board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to implement this section, including rules for the expiration and renewal of a licensed sedation provider host permit. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 648, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor